Wyoming, session 2025, SF0157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-2104(a) by creating a new
paragraph (x), 14-3-214(a), 14-6-203(g)(intro), 14-6-306,
14-6-437 by creating a new subsection (c), 14-6-604(a) by
creating a new paragraph (vi), 21-18-202(a)(vi)(C),
35-20-108 and 42-2-111(a) are amended to read:
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758

9-2-2104. Duties and powers of director of
department.

(a) The director shall:

(x) Notwithstanding any confidentiality
requirements of W.S. 14-3-214(a), 14-6-203(g), 14-6-306,
14-6-437(a), 14-6-604(a), 35-20-108 and 42-2-111(a), review
the effectiveness and impact of programs and services which
shall include sharing data to the extent permitted by
federal law for the purposes of referrals, provision of
services and participation in bona fide research.

14-3-214. Confidentiality of records; exceptions;
penalties; access to information; attendance of school
officials at interviews; access to central registry records
pertaining to child protection cases.

(a) All records concerning reports and investigations
of child abuse or neglect are confidential except as
provided by W.S. 9-2-2104(a)(x) and 14-3-201 through
14-3-215. Any person who willfully violates this subsection
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758
is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be
fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or
imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months,
or both.

14-6-203. Jurisdiction; confidentiality of records.

(g) Except as provided by subsection (j) of this
section and W.S. 9-2-2104(a)(x), all information, reports
or records made, received or kept by any municipal, county
or state officer or employee evidencing any legal or
administrative process or disposition resulting from a
minor's misconduct are confidential and subject to the
provisions of this act. The existence of the information,
reports or records or contents thereof shall not be
disclosed by any person unless:

14-6-306. Disclosure of information and data.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-2-2104(a)(x), all information
and data obtained in the discharge of official duties by
the supervising probation officer is privileged information
and shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758
other than to the juvenile court, department of family
services, department of education, department of health or
to others entitled to receive reports as ordered by the
court, such as multidisciplinary teams.

14-6-437. Records and reports confidential;
exceptions; inspection.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section,
the department may share data in accordance with W.S.
9-2-2104(a)(x).

14-6-604. Access to and dissemination of information.

(a) Information contained in the juvenile justice
information system shall be accessible, whether directly or
through an intermediary, to:

(vi) The department for purposes of sharing data
for referrals, provision of services and participation in
bona fide research in accordance with W.S. 9-2-2104(a)(x).

21-18-202. Powers and duties of the commission.
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758

(a) The commission shall perform the following
general functions:

(vi) In cooperation with the community colleges
and the University of Wyoming, develop and maintain a
common transcript and transfer process system that uses
common course numbering for all undergraduate courses
provided at the community colleges and the University of
Wyoming. The development and ongoing maintenance of the
statewide course numbering system, including determining
course equivalencies, shall be accomplished with the
assistance of appropriate committees that shall include
faculty members and staff of the community colleges and the
University of Wyoming. The system shall:

(C) Extend to the community college
commission, the Wyoming department of education, the
department of workforce services, the department of family
services and the University of Wyoming a statewide
longitudinal education data system, which shall serve as a
statewide exchange for management and analytical reporting
in support of education and workforce outcomes;
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758

35-20-108. Records confidential; exception.

Except as provided under W.S. 9-2-2104(a)(x) and 35-20-116,
records of the department or other agency or the court
pertaining to a vulnerable adult receiving protective
services under this act are not open to public inspection.
Information contained in those records shall not be
disclosed to the public in any manner that will identify
any individual. The records may be made available for
inspection only upon application to the court pursuant to
W.S. 35-20-112 for good cause shown.

42-2-111. Prohibited disclosure and use of records;
penalty; judicial discovery.

(a) Except as provided in this section, and by W.S.
9-2-2104(a)(x) to the extent allowed by federal law, no
person shall disclose, receive, use or knowingly permit or
participate in the use of any information derived from
records maintained pursuant to law or acquired in the
performance of duties under this article for purposes not
directly related to the administration of this article.
SF0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0758

Section 2. The department of family services shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act.

Section 3. The department of family services shall
report to the joint judiciary interim committee on the
types of data that are shared pursuant to this act and any
safeguards that have been implemented to protect personal
data not later than October 1, 2025.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0157